South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H5013.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 1, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-1-320.  (A) The Department of Public Health, in coordination with the Office of the State Fire Marshal, shall establish and administer a statewide firefighter occupational health program as outlined in this section. (B) The department shall provide, at no cost to the firefighter, annual blood testing for per- and polyfluoroalkyl substances (PFAS) for all active career and volunteer firefighters employed by a municipal, county, state, or special purpose district fire department. (C) For purposes of PFAS testing, the department shall contract with a qualified medical provider that meets all of the following requirements: (1) demonstrated expertise in PFAS-specific blood testing and toxic exposure analysis, including interpretation of firefighter exposure levels; (2) ability to perform large-scale blood collection and analysis using standardized laboratory methodologies appropriate for occupational exposure monitoring; (3) capacity to provide statewide access, including coordination with fire departments to ensure participation by career and volunteer firefighters; (4) provision of individual confidential PFAS test results directly to firefighters, including explanatory materials regarding exposure levels and potential health considerations; and (5) capability to provide aggregate, de-identified PFAS exposure data to the department for public health monitoring and reporting purposes. (D)(1) The department also shall provide, at no cost to the firefighter, annual occupational health and cancer screenings, including cancer-related diagnostic testing consistent with nationally recognized firefighter medical and occupational exposure standards. (2) For purposes of occupational health and cancer screenings, the department shall contract with a single statewide medical and diagnostic provider that meets all of the following minimum qualifications: (a) demonstrated specialization in firefighter occupational health, cancer risk screening, and early cancer detection; (b) ability to provide mobile, on-site comprehensive diagnostic screenings statewide, including urban, rural, and volunteer fire departments; (c) capacity to deliver multisystem cancer screening and diagnostic services through an integrated clinical model under a single contract; (d) maintenance of a secure longitudinal health database capable of tracking firefighter screening results over the course of a firefighter's career for trend analysis and early detection; (e) provision of individualized confidential medical reports directly to firefighters, accompanied by clinical interpretation and follow-up guidance from licensed medical professionals; (f) ability to provide aggregate, de-identified health data to the department for program evaluation, epidemiological analysis, and public health planning; and (g) demonstrated experience administering firefighter-specific health screening programs at a statewide or multijurisdictional level. (E) Fire departments are not responsible for contracting or procuring services under this section. (F) Individual test results obtained pursuant to this section are confidential medical records protected by state and federal law and may not be used for discipline, termination, denial of promotion, or any adverse employment action. (G) Fire departments shall allow reasonable paid release time for firefighters to participate in testing and screenings required pursuant to this section. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----